District of Columbia statutes.
16-4416

Representation by lawyer.

A party to an arbitration proceeding may be represented by a lawyer.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

History

This section is referenced in § 16-4404.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 16 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).

Editor's Notes